Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,195
Conflict with rules and regulations; effect.

If any provision of the International Registration Plan Act conflicts with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department, the provisions of the act shall control.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 195.